Utah statutes.
48-3a-1041.   Conversion authorized.

(1)  By complying with Sections 48-3a-1041 through 48-3a-1046, a domestic limited liability company may become:

(a)  a domestic entity that is a different type of entity; or

(b)  a foreign entity that is a different type of entity, if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

(2)  By complying with the provisions of Sections 48-3a-1041 through 48-3a-1046 applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity that is not a foreign limited liability company may become a domestic limited liability company if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

(3)  If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited liability company but does not refer to a conversion, the provision applies to a conversion of the entity as if the conversion were a merger until the provision is amended after  January 1, 2014.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

